Florida, session 2026, SB410.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (4) of section 17 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 18 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 19 public records.â 20 (4)âAGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.â 21 (d)1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term: 22 a.ââHome addressesâ means the dwelling location at which an 23 individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing 24 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot 25 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood 26 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive 27 property information that may reveal the home address. 28 b.ââJudicial assistantâ means a court employee assigned to 29 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320. 30 c.ââTelephone numbersâ includes home telephone numbers, 31 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone 32 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal 33 communications devices. 34 2.a.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 35 and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement 36 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by 37 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and 38 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of 39 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of 40 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal 41 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties 42 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and 43 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments 44 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and 45 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home 46 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 47 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 48 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 49 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 50 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 51 Constitution. 52 b.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 53 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 54 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties 55 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workersâ compensation 56 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal 57 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the 58 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 59 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 60 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 61 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 62 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 63 Constitution. 64 c.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 65 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative 66 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulationâs Bureau of 67 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation 68 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state 69 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses, 70 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 71 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 72 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 73 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 74 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 75 d.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 76 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in 77 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone 78 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment 79 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names 80 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 81 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 82 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 83 e.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 84 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court, 85 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and 86 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names, 87 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 88 employment of the spouses and children of current or former 89 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the 90 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 91 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of 92 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 93 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph 94 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in 95 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 96 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment 97 by the Legislature. 98 f.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 99 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant 100 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide 101 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 102 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 103 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys, 104 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant 105 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools 106 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or 107 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide 108 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from 109 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 110 g.âThe home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone 111 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 112 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 113 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 114 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 115 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 116 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of 117 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division 118 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement 119 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day 120 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates, 121 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims, 122 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative 123 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are 124 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 125 Constitution. 126 h.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 127 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor 128 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors, 129 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency 130 or water management district whose duties include hiring and 131 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or 132 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses, 133 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 134 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 135 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 136 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 137 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 138 i.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 139 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers; 140 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 141 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such 142 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 143 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 144 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 145 Constitution. 146 j.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 147 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 148 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home 149 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of 150 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the 151 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 152 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 153 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 154 k.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 155 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation 156 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention 157 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile 158 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention 159 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers, 160 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II, 161 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor 162 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior 163 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation 164 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of 165 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 166 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children 167 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and 168 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel 169 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 170 Constitution. 171 l.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 172 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant 173 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, 174 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the 175 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 176 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 177 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal 178 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal 179 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations 180 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 181 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders, 182 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant 183 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s. 184 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 185 m.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 186 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors 187 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the 188 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 189 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current 190 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and 191 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 192 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors 193 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 194 Constitution. 195 n.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of 196 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses, 197 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 198 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names 199 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 200 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 201 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 202 o.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 203 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department 204 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination 205 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability 206 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed 207 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health 208 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the 209 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone 210 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses 211 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of 212 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such 213 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 214 the State Constitution. 215 p.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 216 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner 217 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former 218 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties 219 result in a determination of a personâs skill and safety to 220 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses, 221 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of 222 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees; 223 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities 224 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are 225 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 226 Constitution. 227 q.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 228 and photographs of current or former emergency medical 229 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the 230 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 231 places of employment of the spouses and children of such 232 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and 233 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 234 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are 235 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 236 Constitution. 237 r.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 238 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an 239 agencyâs office of inspector general or internal audit 240 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste, 241 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that 242 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline; 243 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 244 and places of employment of spouses and children of such 245 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 246 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 247 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 248 Constitution. 249 s.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 250 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 251 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction 252 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers, 253 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 254 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and 255 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the 256 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 257 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this 258 sub-subparagraph, the term âaddiction treatment facilityâ means 259 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed 260 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention, 261 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed 262 service component described in s. 397.311(27). 263 t.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 264 and photographs of current or former directors, managers, 265 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center 266 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the 267 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a 268 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties 269 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual 270 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation 271 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case 272 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 273 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the 274 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the 275 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 276 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s. 277 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 278 u.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, places of 279 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former 280 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s. 281 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the 282 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names, 283 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates 284 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such 285 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care 286 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt 287 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 288 Constitution. 289 v.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 290 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators 291 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 292 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and 293 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or 294 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations 295 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 296 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s. 297 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 298 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 299 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 300 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 301 reenactment by the Legislature. 302 w.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 303 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county 304 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant 305 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home 306 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and 307 places of employment of the spouses and children of current 308 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county 309 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy 310 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day 311 care facilities attended by the children of current county 312 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys, 313 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city 314 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 315 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a 316 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county 317 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city 318 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public 319 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government 320 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 321 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from 322 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 323 x.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 324 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the 325 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses, 326 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of 327 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former 328 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day 329 care facilities attended by the children of such current or 330 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 331 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is 332 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 333 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, 334 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 335 Legislature. 336 y.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 337 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 338 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 339 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates 340 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children 341 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the 342 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the 343 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 344 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy 345 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court 346 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 347 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the 348 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 349 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 350 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 351 z.(I)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term: 352 (A)ââCongressional memberâ means a person who is elected to 353 serve as a member of the United States House of Representatives 354 or is elected or appointed to serve as a member of the United 355 States Senate. 356 (B)ââPartial home addressâ means the dwelling location at 357 which an individual resides and includes the physical address, 358 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number, 359 plot identification number, legal property description, 360 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other 361 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial 362 home address, except for the city and zip code. 363 (C)ââPublic officerâ means a person who holds one of the 364 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief 365 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner, 366 state representative, state senator, property appraiser, 367 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board 368 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner. 369 (II)âThe following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1) 370 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 371 (A)âThe partial home addresses of a current congressional 372 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 373 (B)âThe telephone numbers of a current congressional member 374 or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child. 375 (C)âThe name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date 376 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or 377 public officer and the name and location of the school or day 378 care facility attended by the minor child. 379 (III)âThis sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open 380 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 381 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and 382 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 383 aa.âThe home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 384 and photographs of current or former private investigators 385 licensed by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; 386 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, 387 and places of employment of the spouses and children of current 388 or former private investigators licensed by the Department of 389 Agriculture and Consumer Services; and the names and locations 390 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of 391 current or former private investigators licensed by the 392 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services are exempt from 393 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 394 This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 395 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 396 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 397 through reenactment by the Legislature. 398 3.a.âAn agency that is the custodian of the information 399 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the 400 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in 401 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that 402 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other 403 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a 404 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption 405 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the 406 statutory basis for the individualâs exemption request and 407 confirm the individualâs status as a party eligible for exempt 408 status. 409 b.âAn agency that is the custodian of information specified 410 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer of the 411 congressional member, public officer, or other person specified 412 in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt status of that 413 information only if an individual requests the maintenance of an 414 exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on the basis of 415 eligibility as a current congressional member or public officer 416 and his or her spouse or child submits, as part of the written 417 and notarized request required by sub-subparagraph a., the date 418 of the congressional memberâs or public officerâs election or 419 appointment to public office, the date on which that office is 420 next subject to election, and, if applicable, the date on which 421 the current congressional memberâs or public officerâs minor 422 child reaches the age of majority. The custodian must maintain 423 an exemption granted pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. until the 424 qualifying conditions for the exemption no longer apply to the 425 person subject to the exemption. 426 4.a.âA county property appraiser, as defined in s. 427 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s. 428 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for 429 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must 430 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status 431 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page 432 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all 433 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser 434 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before 435 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax 436 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1, 437 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may 438 not remove the street address, legal description, or other 439 information identifying real property within the agencyâs 440 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise 441 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is 442 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the 443 public records of the agency. 444 b.âAny information restricted from public display, 445 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be 446 provided to the individual whose information was removed. 447 5.âAn officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other 448 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request 449 for the release of his or her exempt information to the 450 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must 451 specify the information to be released and the party authorized 452 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request, 453 the custodial agency must release the specified information to 454 the party authorized to receive such information. 455 6.âThe exemptions in this paragraph apply to information 456 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the 457 exemption. 458 7.âInformation made exempt under this paragraph may be 459 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized 460 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s. 461 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as 462 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney 463 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing 464 with The Florida Bar. 465 8.âThe exempt status of a home address contained in the 466 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a 467 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon 468 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such 469 real property no longer constitutes a protected partyâs home 470 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party 471 must submit a written request to release the removed information 472 to the county recorder. The written request to release the 473 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a 474 protected partyâs request for release is pursuant to a 475 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the 476 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerkâs 477 file number for each document containing the information to be 478 released. 479 9.âUpon the death of a protected party as verified by a 480 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party 481 can request the county recorder to release a protected 482 decedentâs removed information unless there is a related request 483 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the 484 decedentâs information or unless such removal is otherwise 485 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to 486 release the removed information upon the death of a protected 487 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or 488 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for 489 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must 490 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument 491 number, or clerkâs file number for each document containing the 492 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the 493 release of any document pursuant to such request. 494 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 495 necessity that the home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of 496 birth, and photographs of current and former private 497 investigators licensed by the Department of Agriculture and 498 Consumer Services; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, 499 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and 500 children of current and former private investigators licensed by 501 the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; and the 502 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended 503 by the children of current and former private investigators 504 licensed by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 505 be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 506 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Private 507 investigators routinely engage in sensitive work that may 508 involve uncovering fraud, locating missing persons, or assisting 509 in criminal and civil matters. In the course of their duties, 510 private investigators often interact with individuals who have 511 strong motives to retaliate or cause harm. Public access to a 512 private investigatorâs home address or personal information 513 could expose private investigators and their families to 514 threats, harassment, stalking, or physical violence. Protecting 515 this information does not diminish transparency or 516 accountability in government but instead balances the publicâs 517 right to access records with this stateâs compelling interest in 518 safeguarding the personal safety of those who provide critical 519 private investigative services. Therefore, exempting such 520 information from public records requirements is a reasonable and 521 necessary measure to ensure the security and privacy of private 522 investigators and their families while preserving the integrity 523 of this stateâs public records system. 524 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.